Washington statutes.
RCW 38.42.090

Computation of statutes of limitation.

(1) The period of a service member's military service may not be included in computing any period limited by law, rule, or order, for the bringing of any action or proceeding in a court, or in any board bureau, commission, department, or other agency of a state, or political subdivision of a state, or the United States by or against the service member or the service member's dependents, heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns.

(2) A period of military service may not be included in computing any period provided by law for the redemption of real property sold or forfeited to enforce an obligation, tax, or assessment.

(3) This section does not apply to any period of limitation prescribed by or under the internal revenue laws of the United States.

[ 2005 c 254 s 9.]